fi: Peliautomaatin tyyppi: Erikoinen; Pöydällä pidettävä; Perinteinen; Video; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de Slot Machine: Original; Tampo de mesa; Tradicional; Vídeo; Outro
lt-LT: Lošimo automato tipas: Naujovė; Stalinis; Tradicinis; Vaizdo; Kita
en: Slot machine type: Novelty; Tabletop; Traditional; Video; Other
es: Tipo de máquina tragaperras: Novedoso; Sobremesa; Traditional; Video; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de caça-níqueis: Novidade; Tampo de mesa; Tradicional; Vídeo; Outro
bg-BG: Тип слот машина: Нов; Плот за маса; Традиционен; Видео; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta automata za igre na sreću: Novo; Stolni; Tradicionalni; Video; Ostalo
de: Spielautomatentyp: Neuheit; Tischgerät; Traditionell; Video; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di slot machine: Novità; Da tavolo; Tradizionale; Video; Altro
ru: Тип игрового автомата: Новинка; Настольный; Традиционный; Видео; Другой
zh-TW: 吃角子老虎機類型: 新奇; 桌上型; 傳統的; 視訊/影音; 其他
ja: スロットマシンタイプ: ノベルティ; 卓上; 従来の; ビデオ; その他
nb: Slotmaskintype: Nyhet; Bordplate; Tradisjonell; Video; Annet
zh-CN: 老虎机类型: 新奇; 桌面; 传统; 视频; 其他
nl: Type fruitautomaten: Nieuwigheid; Tafelblad; Traditioneel; Video; Andere
hu: Játékgép típusa: Újszerű; Asztali; Hagyományos; Videó; Egyéb
pl: Rodzaj automatu wrzutowego: Nowość; Blat stołu; Tradycyjny; Video; Inne
vi: Loại máy đánh bạc: Điện thoại độc lạ; Trên mặt bàn; Truyền thống; Video; Khác
sk-SK: Typ hracieho automatu: Novinka; Stolový; Tradičný; Video; Iné
cs: Typ hracího automatu: Moderní; Deska stolu; Tradiční; Video; Jiné
th: ประเภทสล็อตแมชชีน: แปลกใหม่; วางของได้; แบบดั้งเดิม; วิดีโอ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul de aparat de jocuri de noroc: Necomercială; Blat; Tradițională; Video; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta igralnega avtomata: Poseben; Namizni; Tradicionalno; Video; Drugo
tr: Slot Makineleri tipi: Mizah amaçlı; Masaüstü; Geleneksel; Video; Diğer
ko: 슬롯머신 타입: 특이한; 테이블탑; 전통; 비디오; 기타
da: Spillemaskinetype: Moderne; Bordplade; Traditionel; Video; Andet
el: Τύπος κουλοχέρη: Καινοτόμο; Επιτραπέζια; Παραδοσιακή; Βίντεο; Άλλο
sv: Typ av spelautomat: Nyhet; Bordsskiva; Traditionell; Video; Övrigt
fr: Type de machine à sous: Nouveauté; De table; Traditionnel; Vidéo; Autre